Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.070

Plan of readjustment.

Such taxing district is hereby authorized and empowered to take any and all action necessary to carry out any plan of readjustment contemplated in said petition, or as the same may be modified from time to time, notwithstanding any other provisions of law. In case of the refunding of debts of irrigation districts, diking or drainage improvement districts, general debts of cities, or debts of other taxing districts for the refunding of which provision is already made under existing statutes, such refunding shall be had and done as provided for in such existing statutes, except that the tenor and character of the refunding bonds and the assessments levied to meet such bonds may be modified to conform to the capacity of the taxing district, or the individual lots, tracts, or parcels of real property therein, to meet and carry the charges, both direct and contingent, against them, as found and set forth in the plan of readjustment and decree of court; and except also as such existing provisions of law may be otherwise supplemented by such plan of readjustment or the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1935 c 143 s 8; RRS s 5608-8.]